Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1730
City; air space; leases.

Each city of the metropolitan class shall have the power to lease, upon such terms as it shall deem appropriate for a term not to exceed ninety-nine years, air space above any street, alley, major traffic street, connecting link, controlled-access facility, main thoroughfare, boulevard, or other property owned by such city, to one or more of the owners of the fee title adjoining such air space on either or both sides of such street, alley, major traffic street, connecting link, controlled-access facility, main thoroughfare, boulevard or other city property, but only if the air space to be so leased is not needed for and does not materially interfere with the use of such street, alley, major traffic street, connecting link, controlled-access facility, main thoroughfare, boulevard or other city property.

All leases of such air space shall provide the minimum clearances to be maintained at various points over the street, alley, major traffic street, connecting link, controlled-access facility, main thoroughfare, boulevard, or other city property; the area of the air space to be leased; the location of supports, columns, pillars, foundations or other similar or supporting structures within or on such street, alley, major traffic street, connecting link, controlled-access facility, main thoroughfare, boulevard, or other city property; and that such supporting structures shall be so located as not to materially interfere with the use of the street, alley, major traffic street, connecting link, controlled-access facility, main thoroughfare, boulevard, or other city property. Such leases may contain such other terms and conditions as shall be deemed appropriate by the city.

In determining rental under any such lease, the city may take into account the public purpose or use, if any, to be served by the lessee.

Laws 1969, c. 57, § 5, p. 361.